test/src/morphology/N-kaqj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kaʼj: # Noun 122 'eng /est kahju/fin' - full paradigm
     kaʼj+N+Sg+Nom: kaʼj
     kaʼj+N+Sg+Gen: kaʼj
     kaʼj+N+Sg+Par: kaʼjjõ
     kaʼj+N+Sg+Dat: kaʼjjõn
     kaʼj+N+Sg+Ins: kaʼjjõks
     kaʼj+N+Sg+Ill: kaʼjjõ
     kaʼj+N+Sg+Ela: kaʼjstõ
     kaʼj+N+Pl+Nom: kaʼjd
     kaʼj+N+Pl+Gen: kaʼjd
     kaʼj+N+Pl+Par: kaʼjḑi
     kaʼj+N+Pl+Dat: kaʼjdõn
     kaʼj+N+Pl+Ins: kaʼjdõks
     kaʼj+N+Pl+Ill: kaʼjži
     kaʼj+N+Pl+Ela: kaʼjšti
